District of Columbia statutes.
46-355.06

Contest by obligor.

(a)

An obligor may contest the validity or enforcement of an income-withholding order issued in another state and received directly by an employer in the District by registering the order in a tribunal of the District and filing a contest to that order as provided in subchapter VI of this chapter [§ 46-356.01 et seq.], or otherwise contesting the order in the same manner as if the order had been issued by a tribunal of the District.

(b)

The obligor shall give notice of the contest to:

(1)

A support enforcement agency providing services to the obligee;

(2)

Each employer that has directly received an income-withholding order relating to the obligor; and

(3)

The person designated to receive payments in the income-withholding order or, if no person is designated, to the obligee.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 506, 63 DCR 222

History